zh-TW: 彩彈等級: 場地/娛樂; 練習; 錦標賽; 冬季/寒冷天氣; 其他
tr: Paintball kalite seviyesi: Saha/eğlence; Antrenman; Turnuva; Kış/soğuk hava; Diğer
sl-SI: Kakovostni razred paintball kroglic: Igrišče/rekreacija; Trening; Turnir; Zima/hladno vreme; Drugo
en: Paintball grade: Field/rec; Practice; Tournament; Winter/cold weather; Other
it: Grado dei pallini da paintball: Campo/ricreativo; Pratica; Torneo; Inverno/clima freddo; Altro
ja: ペイントボールゲージ: フィールド/レク; 練習; トーナメント; 冬用/寒冷地用; その他
ro-RO: Grad de calitate a bilelor de paintball: Teren/agrement; Antrenament; Turneu; Iarnă/vreme rece; Altele
zh-CN: 漆弹球等级: 场地/娱乐用; 练习用; 锦标赛用; 冬季/寒冷天气用; 其他
bg-BG: Клас на пейнтбол: За поле/развлечение; За тренировка; За турнир; За зима/студено време; Друго
hr-HR: Razred kvalitete paintballa: Teren/rekreacija; Trening; Turnir; Zima/hladno vrijeme; Ostalo
es: Grado de Paintball: Campo/recreativo; Práctica; Torneo; Invierno/clima frío; Otro
sv: Kvalitetsgrad för paintball: Bana/rekreation; Träning; Turnering; Vinter/kallt väder; Övrigt
nb: Paintball-gradering: Bane/fritid; Trening; Turnering; Vinter/kaldt vær; Annet
sk-SK: Úroveň painballu: Ihrisko/rekreačné; Tréningové; Turnajové; Zima/chladné počasie; Iné
ru: Класс пейнтбольных шаров: Полевые/любительские; Тренировочные; Турнирные; Зимние/для холодной погоды; Другое
hu: Paintball fokozata: Hobbi/pálya; Gyakorló; Verseny; Téli/hideg időjárás; Egyéb
el: Βαθμίδα paintball: Πεδίου/Αναψυχής; Προπόνησης; Τουρνουά; Χειμώνα/κρύου καιρού; Άλλο
th: ระดับของเพนต์บอล: สนาม/สันทนาการ; ฝึกซ้อม; ทัวร์นาเมนต์; ฤดูหนาว/อากาศหนาว; อื่นๆ
fr: Qualité paintball: Terrain/loisir; Pratique; Tournoi; Hiver/temps froid; Autre
de: Qualitätsstufe der Paintballs: Field/Rec; Training; Turnier; Winter/kaltes Wetter; Sonstige
ko: 페인트볼 등급: 필드/레크리에이션용; 연습용; 토너먼트용; 겨울/추운 날씨용; 기타
pt-BR: Paintball, categoria: Campo/recreação; Treino; Torneio; Inverno/clima frio; Outro
da: Kvalitetsgrad for paintball: Bane/fritid; Træning; Turnering; Vinter/koldt vejr; Anden
pl: Klasa kulek paintballowych: Polowe/Rekreacyjne; Treningowe; Turniejowe; Zimowe/Na zimną pogodę; Inne
cs: Pro paintball: Pro hřiště / rekreační; Cvičné; Turnajové; Zimní / do chladného počasí; Jiné
nl: Painballklasse: Recreatief; Training; Toernooi; Winter/koud weer; Overig
pt-PT: Nível de paintball: Campo/recreativo; Treino; Torneio; Inverno/tempo frio; Outro
lt-LT: Dažasvydžio lygis: Lauko / pramoginiai; Treniruočių; Turnyriniai; Žieminiai / šalto oro; Kita
fi: Paintball-luokitus: Kenttä/harraste; Harjoittelu; Turnaus; Talvi/kylmä sää; Muu
vi: Phân hạng đạn sơn: Giải trí/Sân tập; Tập luyện; Giải đấu; Mùa đông/thời tiết lạnh; Khác